Utah statutes.
57-1-12.   Form of warranty deed -- Effect.

(1)  Conveyances of land may be substantially in the following form:

WARRANTY DEED

____ (here insert name), grantor, of ____ (insert place of residence), hereby conveys and warrants to ____ (insert name), grantee, of ____ (insert place of residence), for the sum of ____ dollars, the following described tract ____ of land in ____ County, Utah, to wit: (here describe the premises).

Witness the hand of said grantor this __________(month\day\year).

(2)  A warranty deed when executed as required by law shall have the effect of a conveyance in fee simple to the grantee, the grantee's heirs, and assigns:

(a)  of the premises named in the warranty deed;

(b)  of all the appurtenances, rights, and privileges belonging to the premises named in the warranty deed; and

(c)  with covenants from the grantor, the grantor's heirs, and personal representatives, that:

(i)  the grantor lawfully owns fee simple title to and has the right to immediate possession of the premises;

(ii)  the grantor has good right to convey the premises;

(iii)  the grantor guarantees the grantee, the grantee's heirs, and assigns in the quiet possession of the premises;

(iv)  the premises are free from all encumbrances; and

(v)  the grantor, the grantor's heirs, and personal representatives will forever warrant and defend the title of the premises in the grantee, the grantee's heirs, and assigns against all lawful claims whatsoever.

(3)  Any exception to the covenants described in Subsection (2)(c) may be briefly inserted in the warranty deed following the description of the land.

